Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.634

Puget Sound water quality field agents program—Matching requirements.

Sea grant and cooperative extension shall require a match from nonstate sources of at least twenty-five percent of the cost of the services provided, and not exceeding fifty percent of the cost. The match may be either monetary compensation or in-kind services, such as the provision for office space or clerical support. Only direct costs of providing the services, excluding costs of administrative overhead, may be included in the estimate of costs.

[ 1990 c 289 s 3.]